Maine, session 132, LD1753.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA c. 335 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 335
UPPER ST. JOHN VALLEY RECOVERY HIGH SCHOOL PILOT PROGRAM
§9931. Upper St. John Valley Recovery High School Pilot Program
The department shall establish the Upper St. John Valley Recovery High School Pilot
Program, referred to in this section as "the program," as a 3-year pilot program to be based
at the campus of the University of Maine at Fort Kent and to be operated by the Valley
Unified Education Service Center, or its successor organization, in accordance with this
section, beginning with the 2026-2027 school year. Students enrolled in the program are
enrolled as students of School Administrative District No. 27. The program must:
1. Educate high school students. Educate high school students in recovery from
substance use disorder or co-occurring disorders;
2. Provide supervised housing. Provide supervised housing to students enrolled in
the program during the school week;
3. Address diploma requirements. Address requirements for awarding secondary
school diplomas to students enrolled in the program;
4. Require participation in recovery program. Require students to participate in a
concurrent, complementary program of recovery from substance use disorder or
co-occurring disorders while enrolled in the program;
5. Provide minimum staffing. Be staffed by, at a minimum, a certified adult
education teacher, a certified special education teacher or a certified alternative education
teacher and a certified education technician III and a full-time recovery coach that will be
employed by School Administrative District No. 27;
6. Require drug and alcohol testing. Require drug and alcohol testing to be
conducted upon a student's return to campus after a weekend or vacation and require
random drug and alcohol testing throughout the school year; and
7. Provide internship opportunities. Provide University of Maine System students
enrolled in social and behavioral sciences, social work, criminal justice, rural public safety
administration, allied health and nursing programs and other related programs the
opportunity to serve as program interns.
The department shall work with the Valley Unified Education Service Center, or its
successor organization, and the Department of Health and Human Services to establish the
curriculum and enrollment criteria for the program. The department shall adopt necessary
rules to carry out the provisions of this section. Rules adopted pursuant to this section are
routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
This chapter is repealed September 1, 2029.
Page 1 - 132LR1446(01)